New Jersey, session 221, A2405.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the State Board of Education shall not require student growth objectives, or any substantially similar assessment, as part of the evaluation of any teacher. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.